Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4959.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 38b. Fees for a person licensed or seeking licensure as a professional guardian or professional conservator under article 14A of the occupational code, MCL 339.1410 to 339.1413, are as follows: (a) Initial application fee, $250.00. (b) License renewal fee, $100.00. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 4728 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.